Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1032
Attachment; judgment for defendant; effect; return of property or proceeds.

If judgment is rendered in the action for the defendant, the attachment shall be discharged, and the property attached, or its proceeds, shall be returned to him.

R.S.1867, Code § 227, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 7761;

C.S.1922, § 8705;

C.S.1929, § 20-1032;

R.S.1943, § 25-1032.

Order discharging garnishee ipso facto discharges attachment. Alpirn v. Goodman, 3 Neb. Unof. 397, 91 N.W. 530 (1902).